California statutes. Elections Code
(d) The elections official shall request the applicant to display his or her identification for purposes of verifying that identifying numbers of the identification document match those written by the applicant on the application form.

(e) The applicant shall certify to the truth and correctness of the content of the application, under penalty of perjury, with the signature of his or her name at length, including given name, middle name or initial, or initial and middle
 name. The applicant shall state the date and place of execution of the declaration.

(f) Completed applications for voter registration information shall be retained by the elections official for five years from the date of application.

(g) This section shall not apply to requests for information by elections officials for election purposes or by other public agencies for governmental purposes.

(h) The Secretary of State may prescribe additional information to be included in the application for voter registration information.

(i) A county may not provide information for any political subdivision that is not wholly or partially contained within that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 46.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.1.

The Secretary of State may insert fictitious names of voters into the voter registration information database as an investigative and enforcement tool for determining inappropriate or unauthorized uses of voter registration information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 47.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.2.

(a) The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations that describe the best practices for storage and security of voter registration information received by an applicant pursuant to Section 2188.

(b) The Secretary of State may require an applicant to take a training course regarding data security as a condition for the receipt of voter registration information if that course is made available to the applicant at no cost to the applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 106, Sec. 1.   (AB 1044)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.3.

A person or entity who has received voter registration information pursuant to an application made under Section 2188 shall, following discovery or notification of a breach in the security of the storage of the information, disclose the breach in security to the Secretary of State. The disclosure shall be made in the most expedient time possible and without unreasonable delay.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 96, Sec. 2.   (AB 1678)   Effective July 16, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2188.5.

(a) A person who requests voter information pursuant to Section 2188 or who obtains signatures or other information collected for an initiative, referendum, political party qualification, or recall petition shall not send that information outside of the United States or make it available in any way electronically to persons outside the United States, including, but not limited to, access over the Internet.

(b) For purposes of this section, “United States” includes each of the several states of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the territories and possessions of the United States.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 48.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2189.

Before the first day of the opening of the polls for any election held throughout the county, the county elections official shall deliver to the precinct board in each precinct at least one printed or electronic copy of the roster for that polling place, with canceled names lined out or otherwise indicated and with necessary supplements to bring the roster up to date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 16.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2191.

(a) Upon request, the elections official shall compile a voter list or file, by precinct, of all persons who voted in previous elections. This information shall be compiled in conjunction with the purge of voter registration files conducted pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2220) of Chapter 3.

(b) Information compiled pursuant to this section shall include the information that is required to appear in the index as set forth in Section 2183.

(c) Any person, candidate, or committee who is entitled to obtain a copy of any information contained in this article shall, upon written request to the elections official, be
 entitled to obtain the voter list or file compiled pursuant to this section. The elections official shall inform any recipient of this information whether the voter list or file includes a voting history of vote by mail voters. The elections official may require the payment of a fee not to exceed the cost of duplicating the information as a condition to furnishing the information contained in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 17.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2193.

The Secretary of State shall, from the information furnished by the county elections officials pursuant to Section 2187, identify possible duplicate voter registrations. Those voter registrations determined to be duplicates shall be merged and the voter registration bearing the most recent date shall be the active record for that voter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 52.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2194.

(a) Except as provided in Section 2194.1, the affidavit of voter registration information identified in Section 7924.000 of the Government Code:

(1) Shall be confidential and shall not appear on any computer terminal, list, affidavit, duplicate affidavit, or other medium routinely available to the public at the county elections official’s office.

(2) Shall not be used for any personal, private, or commercial purpose, including, but not limited to:

(A) The harassment of any voter or voter’s household.

(B) The advertising, solicitation, sale, or marketing of products or
 services to any voter or voter’s household.

(C) Reproduction in print, broadcast visual or audio, or display on the internet or any computer terminal unless pursuant to paragraph (3).

(3) Shall be provided with respect to any voter, subject to the provisions of Sections 2166, 2166.5, 2166.7, 2166.8, 2166.9, and 2188, to any candidate for federal, state, or local office, to any committee for or against any initiative or referendum measure for which legal publication is made, and to any person for election, scholarly, journalistic, or political purposes, or for governmental purposes, as determined by the Secretary of State.

(4) May be used by the Secretary of State for the purpose of educating voters pursuant to
 Section 12173 of the Government Code.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the California driver’s license number, the California identification card number, the social security number, and any other unique identifier used by the State of California for purposes of voter identification shown on the affidavit of voter registration of a registered voter, or added to voter registration records to comply with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.), are confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the signature of the voter shown on the affidavit of voter registration or an image thereof is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person, except as provided in subdivision (c).

(c) (1) The home address or signature of any voter shall be released whenever the person’s vote is challenged pursuant to Sections 15105 to 15108, inclusive, or Article 3 (commencing with Section 14240) of Chapter 3 of Division 14. The address or signature shall be released only to the challenger, to elections officials, and to other persons as necessary to make, defend against, or adjudicate the challenge.

(2) An elections official shall permit a person to view the signature of a voter for the purpose of determining whether the signature compares with a signature on an affidavit of registration or an image thereof or a petition, but shall not permit a signature to be copied.

(d) A governmental entity, or officer or employee thereof, shall not be held civilly liable as a result of disclosure of the information referred to in this section, unless
 by a showing of gross negligence or willfulness.

(e) For purposes of this section, “voter’s household” is defined as the voter’s place of residence or mailing address or any persons who reside at the place of residence or use the mailing address as supplied on the affidavit of registration pursuant to paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2150.

(f) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, information regarding voters who did not sign a vote by mail ballot identification envelope or whose signature on the vote by mail ballot identification envelope did not compare with the voter’s signature on file shall be treated as confidential voter registration
 information pursuant to this section and Section 7924.000 of the Government Code. This information shall be provided with respect to any voter, subject to the provisions of Sections 2166, 2166.5, 2166.7, 2166.8, 2166.9, and 2188, to any candidate for federal, state, or local office, to any committee for or against any initiative or referendum measure for which legal publication is made, and to any person for election, scholarly, journalistic, or political purposes, or for governmental purposes, as determined by the Secretary of State, but otherwise shall not be disclosed to any person. Any disclosure of this information shall be accompanied by a notice to the recipient regarding Sections 18109 and 18540.

(2) Voter information provided pursuant to this subdivision shall be updated daily, include the name of the voter, and be provided in a searchable electronic format. The daily update shall also include, as applicable, information regarding whether a form has been received from the voter to verify their signature pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3019, whether a form has been received or the voter has otherwise provided a signature pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 3019, and whether the signature provided pursuant to subdivision (d) or (e) of Section 3019 did or did not compare.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 300, Sec. 2.5.   (AB 1392)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2194.1.

Any affidavit of registration information identified in Section 7924.000 of the Government Code in existence 100 years after the creation of the record shall be available to the public. If records are contained in the great registers of voters and the bound register contains information covering more than one year, the records shall not be available to the public until the entire contents of the register have been recorded for at least 100 years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 93.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2.5. Online Voter Registration [2196. - 2198.]

2196.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person who is qualified to register to vote and who has a valid California driver’s license or state identification card may submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website.

(2) An affidavit submitted pursuant to this section is effective upon receipt of the affidavit by the Secretary of State if the affidavit is received on or before the last day to register for an election to be held in the precinct of the person submitting the affidavit.

(3) The affiant shall affirmatively attest to the truth of the information provided in the affidavit.

(4) The affidavit shall contain, before or at the time that the applicant affirmatively assents to the use of the applicant’s signature pursuant to paragraph (5), a statement that the county elections official shall compare the affiant’s signature appearing on an identification envelope for the return of a vote by mail ballot cast in a future election with the signatures appearing in the voter’s registration record, including the signature appearing on the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card.

(5) For voter registration purposes, the applicant shall affirmatively assent to the use of the applicant’s signature from the applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card.

(6) For each electronic affidavit, the Secretary of State shall obtain an electronic copy of the applicant’s signature from the
 applicant’s driver’s license or state identification card directly from the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(7) The Secretary of State shall require a person who submits an affidavit pursuant to this section to submit all of the following:

(A) The number from the person’s California driver’s license or state identification card.

(B) The person’s date of birth.

(C) The last four digits of the person’s social security number.

(D) Any other information the Secretary of State deems necessary to establish the identity of the affiant.

(8) Upon submission of an affidavit pursuant to this section, the electronic voter registration
 system shall provide for immediate verification of both of the following:

(A) That the applicant has a California driver’s license or state identification card and that the number for that driver’s license or identification card provided by the applicant matches the number for that person’s driver’s license or identification card that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(B) That the date of birth provided by the applicant matches the date of birth for that person that is on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(9) The Secretary of State shall employ security measures to ensure the accuracy and integrity of affidavits of voter registration submitted electronically pursuant to this section.

(b) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall
 use the electronic voter registration system required by this section to comply with its duties and responsibilities as a voter registration agency pursuant to the federal National Voter Registration Act of 1993 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20501 et seq.).

(c) The Department of Motor Vehicles and the Secretary of State shall maintain a process and the infrastructure to allow the electronic copy of the applicant’s signature and other information required under this section that is in the possession of the department to be transferred to the Secretary of State and to the county election management systems to allow a person who is qualified to register to vote in California to register to vote under this section.

(d) If an applicant cannot electronically submit the information required pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (a), the applicant shall nevertheless be able to complete the affidavit
 of voter registration electronically on the Secretary of State’s internet website, print a hard copy of the completed affidavit, and mail or deliver the hard copy of the completed affidavit to the Secretary of State or the appropriate county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 53.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2197.

No later than July 1, 2014, the California Health Benefit Exchange shall implement a process and the infrastructure to allow a person who applies online with the California Health Benefit Exchange for service or assistance, or who submits a recertification, renewal, or change of address form relating to the service or assistance online, to submit an affidavit of voter registration electronically on the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 505, Sec. 1.   (SB 35)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Section operative September 26, 2016, when Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, amended Section 2196 and deleted its condition in former subd. (e) that restricted the operation of Chapter 2.5 (Sections 2196 to 2198).)
-------------------------------------------

2198.

Each Internet Web site maintained by the state shall include a hyperlink on the site’s homepage to the online voter registration page of the Internet Web site of the Secretary of State.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 277, Sec. 1.   (SB 44)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Section operative September 26, 2016, when Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, amended Section 2196 and deleted its condition in former subd. (e) that restricted the operation of Chapter 2.5 (Sections 2196 to 2198).)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Cancellation and Voter File Maintenance [2200. - 2241.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [2200. - 2214.]

2200.

The registration of a voter is permanent for all purposes during his or her life, unless and until the affidavit of registration is canceled by the Secretary of State or the county elections official for any of the causes specified in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 55.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2201.

(a) The county elections official shall cancel the registration in the following cases:

(1) At the signed, written request of the person registered.

(2) When the mental incompetency of the person registered is legally established as provided in Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, and 2211. The county elections office shall use only information provided by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2211.5 to cancel a voter registration for this reason.

(3) Upon proof that the person is presently imprisoned for conviction of a felony. The
 county elections office shall use only information provided by the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2212, by a United States District Court, or by the Federal Bureau of Prisons to cancel a voter registration for this reason.

(4) Upon the production of a certified copy of a judgment directing the cancellation to be made.

(5) Upon the death of the person registered.

(6) Pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 2220).

(7) Upon official notification that the voter is registered to vote in another state.

(8) Upon proof that the person is otherwise ineligible to vote.

(b) The Secretary of State may cancel the registration in the following cases:

(1) When the mental incompetency of the person registered is legally established as provided in Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, and 2211.

(2) Upon proof that the person is presently imprisoned for the conviction of a felony.

(3) Upon the death of the person registered.

(c) (1) Between 15 and 30 days, inclusive, before canceling a person’s registration for the reasons specified in paragraph (2), (3), (5), or (6) of subdivision (a), the county elections official shall send a forwardable notice by
 first-class mail, including a postage-paid and preaddressed return form, to the voter.

(A) The forwardable notice shall be provided in the person’s preferred language if the county is required to provide translated ballots in that language pursuant to Section 203 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 10503).

(B) The notice shall include a statement substantially similar to the following:

“IMPORTANT NOTICE. Your voter registration record is scheduled to be canceled on [date]. This cancellation is due to information the [county name] County elections office has received indicating your ineligibility to vote in that county due to a change of residence, death, prison commitment or mental incapacity to vote pursuant to
 Sections 2208, 2209, 2210, or 2211 of the California Elections Code, as applicable.

If you believe this cancellation is in error, please notify our office within 15 days from the date of this notice either by returning the attached postage-paid postcard or by calling [county elections office phone number] toll free.

If we do not receive your response to this notice, you may be required to reregister to vote in the next election or to vote using a provisional ballot. You can find more information about voter eligibility rules on the Secretary of State’s internet website at [URL] or voter hotline at [phone numbers]. You can also check your current registration status at [URL].”

(2) The preaddressed return form described in paragraph (1) shall include all of the
 following:

(A) Space for the voter to provide their current place of residence.

(B) Space for the voter to provide their current mailing address, if different from the place of residence.

(C) A box next to a statement substantially similar to the following: “The cancellation of my voter record is in error because I have not been deemed mentally incompetent to vote by a court of law, I am not currently serving a state or federal prison term, and I have not died. Additionally, if I have moved, I have provided my new residential address on this form.”

(D) Space for the voter to provide their signature and the date.

(3) The elections official may send additional written notices to a voter, and may also notify the voter in person, by telephone or email, or by other means of the planned registration cancellation.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2025.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 1) and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 424, Sec. 2.   (AB 2951)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Operative July 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2202.

(a) The county elections official shall preserve all uncanceled affidavits of registration in a secure manner that will protect the confidentiality of the voter information consistent with Section 2194.

The affidavits of registration shall constitute the register required to be kept by Article 5 (commencing with Section 2183) of Chapter 2.

(b) In lieu of maintaining uncanceled affidavits of registration, the county elections official may microfilm, record on optical disc, or record on any other electronic medium that does not permit additions, deletions, or changes to the original document, the uncanceled
 affidavits of registration. Any such use of an electronic medium to record uncanceled affidavits shall protect the security and confidentiality of the voter information. The county elections official may dispose of any uncanceled affidavits of registration transferred pursuant to this section. The disposal of any uncanceled affidavits shall be performed in a manner that does not compromise the security or confidentiality of the voter information contained therein. For purposes of this section, a duplicate copy of an affidavit of registration shall be deemed an original. The Secretary of State may adopt appropriate regulations for the purpose of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 57.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2205.

The local registrar of births and deaths shall notify the county elections official not later than the 15th day of each month of all deceased persons 16 years of age and over, whose deaths were registered with him or her or of whose deaths he or she was notified by the State Registrar of Vital Statistics during the preceding month. This notification shall include at least the name, sex, age, birthplace, birth date, place of residence, and date and place of death of each decedent.

The county elections official shall cancel the affidavit of registration of the deceased voter.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 364, Sec. 5) by Stats. 2014, Ch. 619, Sec. 6.   (SB 113)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Amendment by Stats. 2009, Ch. 364, with text revised by this amendment, became operative on September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Sec. 7 of Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

2206.

The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations to facilitate the availability of death statistics from the State Department of Health Services. The data shall be used by the Secretary of State or county elections officials in canceling the affidavit of registration of deceased persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 60.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

(a) A person is presumed competent to vote regardless of the person’s conservatorship status. A person shall be deemed mentally incompetent, and therefore disqualified from voting, if, during the course of any of the proceedings set forth below, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person cannot communicate, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, and any of the following apply:

(1) A conservator for the person or the person and estate is appointed pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of the Probate Code.

(2) A conservator for the person or the person and estate is appointed pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with
 Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(3) A conservator is appointed for the person pursuant to proceedings initiated under Section 5352.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the person has been found not competent to stand trial, and the person’s trial or judgment has been suspended pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code.

(4) A person has pleaded not guilty by reason of insanity, has been found to be not guilty pursuant to Section 1026 of the Penal Code, and is deemed to be gravely disabled at the time of judgment as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 5008 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) If the proceeding under the Welfare and Institutions Code is heard by a jury, the jury shall unanimously find by clear and convincing
 evidence that the person cannot communicate, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process before the person shall be disqualified from voting.

(c) If an order establishing a conservatorship is made and in connection with the order it is found by clear and convincing evidence that the person cannot communicate, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(d) A person shall not be disqualified from voting pursuant to this section on the basis that the person does, or would need to do, any of the following to complete an affidavit of voter registration:

(1) Signs the affidavit of voter registration with a mark or a cross pursuant to subdivision (b)
 of Section 2150.

(2) Signs the affidavit of voter registration by means of a signature stamp pursuant to Section 354.5.

(3) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with the assistance of another person pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2150.

(4) Completes the affidavit of voter registration with reasonable accommodations.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 69.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2209.

(a) For conservatorships established pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 1400) of the Probate Code, the court investigator shall, during the yearly or biennial review of the conservatorship as required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1850) of Part 3 of Division 4 of the Probate Code, review the person’s capability of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process.

(b) If the person has been disqualified from voting by reason of being incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, or by reason of being incapable of completing an affidavit of voter registration, the court investigator shall determine
 if the person continues to be incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, and the investigator shall so inform the court. If the investigator determines that the person continues to be incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, a court hearing on the issue is unnecessary. If the investigator finds that the person is not incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, the court shall hold a hearing to determine if, by clear and convincing evidence, the person cannot communicate, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process. Unless the person is found incapable of communicating that desire, the person’s right to register to vote shall be restored, and the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(c) If the person has not been found incapable of communicating, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process, and the court investigator determines that the person is no longer capable of communicating that desire, the investigator shall so notify the court. The court shall hold a hearing to determine if, by clear and convincing evidence, the person cannot communicate, with or without reasonable accommodations, a desire to participate in the voting process. If the court determines that the person cannot communicate that desire, the court shall order the person to be disqualified from voting pursuant to Section 2208, and the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 6.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2210.

(a) If the person or the person and estate is under a conservatorship established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5350) of Part 1 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the person may contest their disqualification from voting pursuant to the procedure set forth in Section 5358.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) When the conservatorship described in subdivision (a) terminates after one year, the person’s right to register to vote shall be automatically restored and the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5. If a petition is filed for the reappointment of the conservator, a new determination shall be made as to whether the person should be disqualified from
 voting.

(c) If the right to vote is restored pursuant to Section 5358.3 of the Welfare and Institutions Code or if the conservatorship is terminated in a proceeding held pursuant to Section 5364 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 7) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 8.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.

(a) Any person who (1) has plead not guilty by reason of insanity and who has been found to be not guilty pursuant to Section 1026 of the Penal Code, (2) has been found incompetent to stand trial and whose trial or judgment has been suspended pursuant to Section 1370 of the Penal Code, (3) has been convicted of a felony and who was judicially determined to be a mentally disordered sex offender pursuant to former Section 6300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, as repealed by Chapter 928 of the Statutes of 1981, or (4) has been convicted of a felony and is being treated at a state hospital pursuant to Section 2684 of the Penal Code shall be disqualified from voting or registering to vote during that time that the person is involuntarily confined, pursuant to a court order, in a public or private
 facility.

(b) Upon the order of commitment to a treatment facility referred to in subdivision (a), the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(c) If the person is later released from the public or private treatment facility, the court shall provide notice to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2211.5.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 9) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 10.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2211.5.

(a) By the first day of each month, and more frequently if the clerk so chooses, the clerk of the superior court of each county shall notify the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (b) of each of the following:

(1) All findings made by the court regarding any person’s competency to vote, as specified in each of Sections 2208 through 2211, inclusive, since the clerk’s last report.

(2) The total number of proceedings, as specified in paragraphs (1) through (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 2208, that occurred in that court since the clerk’s last report.

(b) In consultation with the Secretary of State, the Judicial Council shall adopt rules of court to implement this section and Judicial Council forms that shall be used by courts to furnish the notices described in subdivision (a). The forms shall contain clearly identified spaces for all of the following:

(1) Personal identification information for the affected person, including all of the following:

(A) All known first names.

(B) All known last names.

(C) All known middle names.

(D) All known name suffixes.

(E) Last
 known address.

(F) Date of birth.

(G) Last four digits of the person’s social security number, if available.

(H) Driver’s license or state-issued identification number, if available.

(2) The court case number.

(3) The date of the order affecting the individual’s voting rights.

(4) Whether the court’s order is made pursuant to Section 2208, 2209, 2210, or 2211.

(5) Whether the legal effect of the court’s order is a disqualification or a restoration of the right to vote.

(6) A certification, if applicable, that the individual has been disqualified from voting due to the court’s finding by clear and convincing evidence that the individual is incapable, with or without reasonable accommodations, to communicate a desire to participate in the voting process.

(c) The Secretary of State shall inform the clerk of the court when it receives a notice from the court that is missing any information required by subdivision (b).

(d) Upon receipt of all of the required information described in subdivision (b), the Secretary of State shall do both of the following:

(1) Identify any registration record in the statewide voter database
 that contains personal identifying information that matches each of the unique identifiers described in subdivision (b).

(2) Within three days of receiving the information from the court, for any matched records described in paragraph (1), provide the information described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), the corresponding unique identifier or identifiers contained in the statewide voter database, and a statement regarding whether the legal effect of the court’s order is to disqualify or restore the right to vote, to the appropriate county elections official.

(e) Upon receiving information from the Secretary of State pursuant to subdivision (d), the county elections official shall do either of the following, as applicable:

(1) The elections official shall begin the cancellation procedures described in subdivision (c) of Section 2201 for any person whose registration information matches the unique identifier or identifiers provided by the Secretary of State and who, according to the information provided by the Secretary of State, has been disqualified to vote by a court.

(2) (A) If a person’s right to vote has been restored and their address is within the county according to the information provided by the Secretary of State, the elections official shall notify the person that their voting rights are restored and that they may register to vote if they are otherwise eligible. The elections official shall also provide the person with information regarding the procedures for registering to vote. If the address provided by the Secretary
 of State is different from the address contained in the county’s voter registration file, the elections official shall provide the foregoing notice and information to the person at both addresses.

(B) The Secretary of State shall prepare a form that county elections officials shall use to provide the notice described in subparagraph (A).

(f) A county or county elections official shall not be liable for taking or failing to take the actions described in subdivision (e) when the county or county elections official has received erroneous information from the Secretary of State.

(g) If a person who is ineligible to vote receives a notice under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), subsequently becomes registered or
 preregistered to vote, and votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the person’s registration or preregistration, that person shall be presumed to have acted with official authorization and shall not be guilty of fraudulently voting or attempting to vote pursuant to Section 18560, unless that person willfully votes or attempts to vote knowing that the person is not eligible to vote.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 807, Sec. 11.   (AB 2841)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2212.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Conviction” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2101.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(3) “Imprisoned” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 2101.

(4) “Parole” means a term of supervision by the department.

(5) “Statewide voter database” means the statewide voter registration database
 developed in compliance with the requirements of the federal Help America Vote Act of 2002 (52 U.S.C. Sec. 20901 et seq.).
